Utah statutes.
49-11-616.   Benefits information.

(1)  The office shall provide written general information to each participating employer concerning benefits available under this title.

(2) (a)  A participating employer shall provide the information under Subsection (1) to each eligible employee immediately upon:

(i)  termination of service;

(ii)  leave of absence;

(iii)  commencement of long-term disability benefits; or

(iv)  retirement.

(b) (i)  Each participating employer shall maintain the records necessary to demonstrate that each employee has received the information outlined in Subsection (1).

(ii)  The records shall be made available to the office upon request.

(3) (a)  The office shall provide each participating employer with a form to be signed by each employee which verifies that the employee has been given the information required by this section.

(b)  A copy of the signed form shall be immediately forwarded to the office by the participating employer or the employee.

